Hawaii statutes.
[§455-8.4] Public health emergency;
temporary and limited license for licensed out-of-state naturopathic
physicians. (a) If a public health emergency or disaster condition is
declared by the governor, the board shall allow naturopathic physicians licensed
in another state to provide temporary and limited naturopathic medicine in
Hawaii under special provisions during the period of the declared public health
emergency or disaster condition, subject to limitations and conditions as the
governor and the board may prescribe.

(b) A limited and temporary license issued
pursuant to this section shall be valid only for the period of the declared
public health emergency or disaster condition.

(c) Out-of-state naturopathic physicians shall
submit to the board the following information:

(1) Verification of a valid, permanent, current, and
unrestricted license to practice naturopathic medicine in another state which
is not the subject of a pending investigation by a state medical board, or
another state or federal agency; and

(2) A valid United States passport or state-issued
driver's license for photo identification. [L Sp 2009, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next